Hawaii statutes.
§266-25 Violation of rules; penalty.
(a) In addition to the reimbursement of fines and costs as provided in section
266-28, any person who violates any rule made, adopted, and published by the
department of transportation as herein provided, or who violates any lawful
command of any harbor master, harbor agent, facility security officer, or
harbor district manager, while in the discharge of the person's duty, or who
violates this chapter, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), shall be
fined not more than $1,000 or less than $50 for each violation, and any vessel,
the agents, owner, or crew of which violate the rules of the department or this
part, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or less than $50 for each violation;
provided that in addition to or as a condition to the suspension of the fines
and penalties, a court, the department, or an administrative hearings officer
may deprive the offender of the privilege of entering the secured area of the
port or obtaining an operating or mooring permit for any vessel in state waters
for a period of not more [than] one year; provided further that the offender,
at the resumption of the privilege of operating or mooring a vessel in state
waters, shall assume the last position on any waiting list.

(b) Any person who violates any rule adopted
by the department of transportation under this part regulating vehicular
parking or traffic movement shall have committed a traffic infraction as set
forth in chapter 291D, the adjudication of which shall be subject to the
provisions contained therein. A person found to have committed such a traffic
infraction shall be fined not more than:

(1) $100 for a first violation;

(2) $200 for a second violation; and

(3) $500 for a third or subsequent violation.

(c) Any person who violates any rule adopted
by the department of transportation relating to unauthorized discharge,
dumping, or abandoning any petroleum product, hazardous material, or sewage in
any state harbor facility or state waters in violation of the state water
quality standards established by the department of health, shall be fined not
more than $10,000 for each day of violation, and any vessel, the agents, owner,
or crew of which violate the rules of the department of transportation or this
chapter, shall be fined not more than $10,000 for each day of violation;
provided that in addition to or as a condition to the suspension of the fines
and penalties, the court, department, or administrative [hearings] officer may
deprive the offender of the privilege of entering the secured area of the port
or obtaining an operating or mooring permit for any vessel in state waters for
a period of not more than one year; provided further that the offender, at the
resumption of the privilege of operating or mooring a vessel in state waters,
shall assume the last position on any waiting list. [L 1911, c 163, §9; RL
1925, §844; RL 1935, §1744; RL 1945, §4995; RL 1955, §112-23; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §26; HRS §266-25; am L 1984, c 187, §2; am L 1987, c 361, §2; am L 2007, c
139, §3; am L 2012, c 313, §3]

Case Notes

Penalties authorized in this section are criminal penalties,
making defendant potentially eligible for a jury trial. 84 H. 65, 929 P.2d 78.

Where no term of imprisonment was authorized under this
section for violation of administrative rule regulating boat moorings,
violation a presumptively petty offense for which constitutional right to jury
trial did not attach; consideration of other relevant factors failed to
overcome presumption. 84 H. 65, 929 P.2d 78.

Penalties authorized by this section are criminal penalties
for a penal offense. 10 H. App. 220, 864 P.2d 1109.

Cited: 49 H. 651, 657, 426 P.2d 626.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next